Utah statutes.
42-3-4.   Cancellation by owner -- Fee.
When any owner of a registered farm desires to cancel its registered name, the
owner shall write on the back of the certificate the following: "This name is
canceled, and I hereby release all rights thereunder," and shall sign such
statement in the presence of a witness and file the same in the office of the
commissioner of agriculture and food.  For such filing the commissioner of
agriculture and food shall charge a fee determined by the commissioner
pursuant to Section 63J-1-504, which shall be paid to the General Fund.  The
commissioner of agriculture and food shall, when such certificate so endorsed
has been filed in the commissioner’s office, write on the margin of the
register of such name the word "canceled."
